Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.096

Duty of secretary of state to file—Review of refusal to file.

RCW 23.95.225 governs the secretary of state's duty to file records delivered to the secretary of state for filing, the manner and effect of filing, and procedures that apply when the secretary of state refuses to file a record.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7111; 2015 c 188 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.